Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.260

Construction.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as amending, repealing, or otherwise affecting RCW 28B.20.250 through 28B.20.255.

[ 1989 c 419 s 10.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.